Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201260-4,167.01
Alcoholic
liquor; disqualification decision; director; duties.

(1)
The director shall reduce the decision disqualifying a commercial driver from
operating a commercial motor vehicle pursuant to a hearing under section 60-4,167
to writing and the director shall notify the person in writing of the disqualification
within seven days following a hearing. The decision shall set forth the period
of disqualification and be served by mailing it to such person by regular United States mail
to the address provided to the director at the hearing or, if the person does
not appear at the hearing, to the address appearing on the records of the
director. If the address on the director's records differs from the address
on the arresting peace officer's report, the notice shall be sent to both
addresses.

(2) If the director does not disqualify the commercial driver
from operating a commercial motor vehicle, the director shall notify the person
in writing of the decision within seven days following a hearing. The notice
shall be mailed by regular
United States mail as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
No reinstatement fee shall be charged.

Laws 1996, LB 323, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB751, § 37.
July 19, 2012